Missouri, session 2026, HB3291.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 227, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto three new sections, to
be known as sections 227.907, 227.908, and 227.909, to read as follows:
227.907. The bridge on State Highway 139 crossing over Barber Creek in
Putnam County shall be designated the "PVT William W Smith Memorial Bridge".
The department of transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs
designating such bridge, with the costs to be paid by the department of transportation.
227.908. The bridge on State Highway 139 crossing over Hooton/Newtown Creek
in Sullivan County shall be designated the "PVT Charles A Paxton Memorial Bridge".
The department of transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs
designating such bridge, with the costs to be paid by the department of transportation.
227.909. The bridge on State Highway EE crossing over Medicine Creek in
Sullivan County shall be designated the "CPL Vernon D Jobe Memorial Bridge". The
department of transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs designating
such bridge, with the costs to be paid by the department of transportation.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.